Connecticut, session 2026, SB00318.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Agriculture, in consultation with the Office of Victim Services, shall
study the impact of the need for placement of companion animals on
victims of domestic violence. Such study shall include, but not be
limited to, the: (1) Existing resources available for victims of domestic
violence to find temporary or permanent placements for a companion
animal, (2) identification of one or more persons who may serve as a
contact person for victims of domestic violence in the state who need to
place their companion animal in the care of another person due to such
circumstance, and (3) feasibility of establishing a phone number or other
electronic communication line that is accessible twenty-four hours a day
for victims of domestic violence in the state who need to place their
companion animal in the care of another person due to such
circumstance. Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall
submit the findings and any associated recommendations concerning
such study to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters related to the environment, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
Sec. 2. Subsection (d) of section 22-26f of the 2026 supplement to the

Substitute Senate Bill No. 318
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(d) The State Veterinarian may issue orders to prevent the spread of
[contagious and infectious diseases] disease among animals and poultry
and may protect the public from such diseases as may be transmissible
to human beings, either directly or through the products of such
animals.
Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) Not later than July 1, 2026, the
Commissioner of Agriculture shall convene a working group within the
Department of Agriculture to study the animal population control
program, established pursuant to section 22-380g of the general statutes,
and develop recommendations concerning such program, including,
but not limited to, ways to augment and stabilize the funding of such
program. Such working group shall consist of: (1) The Commissioner of
Agriculture, or the commissioner's designee, (2) the executive director
of the Connecticut Humane Society, or the executive director's designee,
(3) a representative from an animal welfare organization, as appointed
by the commissioner, (4) a representative from the Connecticut
Veterinary Medical Association, (5) a representative of an organization
that represents animal control officers, and (6) any additional members,
as deemed necessary by the commissioner. The commissioner, on or
before January 1, 2027, shall submit the recommendations of such
working group to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters related to the environment, in accordance
with section 11-4a of the general statutes.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-112 2 of 2